engine/dictionaries/is/is.aff
FLAG num
AM st:hitta po:so
AM st:hjálpa po:so
AM st:hjóla po:so
AM st:hlaupa po:so
AM st:hljóma po:so
AM st:hlusta po:so
AM st:hluta po:so
AM st:hlýja po:so
AM st:hljóta po:so
AM st:hlæja po:so
AM st:hnerra po:so
AM st:hneyksla po:so
AM st:hola po:so
AM st:hoppa po:so
AM st:horfa po:so
AM st:hósta po:so
AM st:hrapa po:so
AM st:hreyfa po:so
AM st:hrista po:so
AM st:hrópa po:so
AM st:hræða po:so
AM st:hrækja po:so
AM st:hræra po:so
AM st:hugga po:so
AM st:hughreysta po:so
AM st:húfa po:so
AM st:hverfa po:so
AM st:hvísla po:so
AM st:hylja po:so
AM st:hypja po:so
AM st:hætta po:so
AM st:innlima po:so
AM st:jaðra po:so
AM st:jarma po:so
AM st:játa po:so
AM st:kaffæra po:so
AM st:kalla po:so
AM st:kunna po:so
AM st:kasta po:so
AM st:kaupa po:so
AM st:kemba po:so
AM st:koma po:so
AM st:kenna po:so
AM st:keyra po:so
AM st:kíma po:so
AM st:klífa po:so
AM st:kría po:so
AM st:kryfja po:so
AM st:kvaka po:so
AM st:kvarta po:so
AM st:kveðja po:so
AM st:kveikja po:so
AM st:kynda po:so
AM st:kjósa po:so
AM st:laga po:so
AM st:lappa po:so
AM st:leggja po:so
AM st:leiðrétta po:so
AM st:leika po:so
AM st:lengja po:so
AM st:leyfa po:so
AM st:lifa po:so
AM st:liggja po:so
AM st:limlesta po:so
AM st:líða po:so
AM st:lífga po:so
AM st:lífláta po:so
AM st:líkja po:so
AM st:ljóma po:so
AM st:ljá po:so
AM st:lofa po:so
AM st:loga po:so
AM st:lúffa po:so
AM st:lyfta po:so
AM st:lykta po:so
AM st:lækna po:so
AM st:læra po:so
AM st:læsa po:so
AM st:muna po:so
AM st:mara po:so
AM st:mega po:so
AM st:meiða po:so
AM st:melta po:so
AM st:menga po:so
AM st:miskunna po:so
AM st:mismuna po:so
AM st:móka po:so
AM st:munu po:so
AM st:myrða po:so
AM st:mæla po:so
AM st:mæna po:so
AM st:mölbrotna po:so
AM st:mölbrjóta po:so
AM st:naga po:so
AM st:nauðga po:so
AM st:nefna po:so
AM st:neita po:so
AM st:nema po:so
AM st:njóta po:so
AM st:ná po:so
AM st:opna po:so
AM st:orka po:so
AM st:óma po:so
AM st:óska po:so
AM st:óttast po:so
AM st:perla po:so
AM st:planta po:so
AM st:pynda po:so
AM st:pynta po:so
AM st:pæla po:so
AM st:redda po:so
AM st:refsa po:so
AM st:rétta po:so
AM st:riða po:so
AM st:ríða po:so
AM st:ropa po:so
AM st:rota po:so
AM st:rugga po:so
AM st:rúlla po:so
AM st:rúnta po:so
AM st:ræða po:so
AM st:ráða po:so
AM st:ræsa po:so
AM st:safna po:so
AM st:sakfella po:so
AM st:sakna po:so
AM st:sama po:so
AM st:sofa po:so
AM st:segja po:so
AM st:seinka po:so
AM st:selja po:so
AM st:senda po:so
AM st:setja po:so
AM st:sjá po:so
AM st:sigla po:so
AM st:sigra po:so
AM st:sigta po:so
AM st:sindra po:so
AM st:sitja po:so
AM st:síma po:so
AM st:skulu po:so
AM st:skammstafa po:so
AM st:skanna po:so
AM st:skapa po:so
AM st:skjálfa po:so
AM st:skemma po:so
AM st:skera po:so
AM st:skilja po:so
AM st:skipta po:so
AM st:skoða po:so
AM st:skrúfa po:so
AM st:skunda po:so
AM st:skyggja po:so
AM st:skyrpa po:so
AM st:slasa po:so
AM st:slátra po:so
AM st:sleikja po:so
AM st:sleppa po:so
AM st:slíta po:so
AM st:slá po:so
AM st:smita po:so
AM st:snerta po:so
AM st:snúa po:so
AM st:sofna po:so
AM st:spara po:so
AM st:sparka po:so
AM st:spenna po:so
AM st:splæsa po:so
AM st:sprengja po:so
AM st:springa po:so
AM st:steinsteypa po:so
AM st:stela po:so
AM st:standa po:so
AM st:strá po:so
AM st:streyma po:so
AM st:stríða po:so
AM st:stuðla po:so
AM st:stunda po:so
AM st:stýra po:so
AM st:suða po:so
AM st:sulta po:so
AM st:svamla po:so
AM st:svara po:so
AM st:svelta po:so
AM st:sverja po:so
AM st:svíða po:so
AM st:svæfa po:so
AM st:synda po:so
AM st:syngja po:so
AM st:syrgja po:so
AM st:sytra po:so
AM st:sjúga po:so
AM st:sýna po:so
AM st:súpa po:so
AM st:sætta po:so
AM st:tala po:so
AM st:tárfella po:so
AM st:teikna po:so
AM st:taka po:so
AM st:telja po:so
AM st:temja po:so
AM st:tilheyra po:so
AM st:tindra po:so
AM st:titra po:so
AM st:tíma po:so
AM st:toga po:so
AM st:tortíma po:so
AM st:tortryggja po:so
AM st:treysta po:so
AM st:trufla po:so
AM st:trúa po:so
AM st:tryggja po:so
AM st:tyggja po:so
AM st:ulla po:so
AM st:umfaðma po:so
AM st:undra po:so
AM st:uppgötva po:so
AM st:útskýra po:so
AM st:vaka po:so
AM st:vakna po:so
AM st:vanmeta po:so
AM st:vantreysta po:so
AM st:vara po:so
AM st:veðja po:so
AM st:vaða po:so
AM st:veina po:so
AM st:vita po:so
AM st:vekja po:so
AM st:velja po:so
AM st:venja po:so
AM st:verða po:so
AM st:vernda po:so
AM st:versna po:so
AM st:verja po:so
AM st:vaxa po:so
AM st:villa po:so
AM st:vilja po:so
AM st:vinda po:so
AM st:vinna po:so
AM st:vista po:so
AM st:vofa po:so
AM st:vona po:so
AM st:yrkja po:so
AM st:þakka po:so
AM st:þekkja po:so
AM st:þenkja po:so
AM st:þerra po:so
AM st:þoka po:so
AM st:þola po:so
AM st:þorna po:so
AM st:þrá po:so
AM st:þruma po:so
AM st:þrýsta po:so
AM st:þræta po:so
AM st:þverra po:so
AM st:þvo po:so
AM st:þykja po:so
AM st:þyrla po:so
AM st:þýða po:so
AM st:æða po:so
AM st:æla po:so
AM st:ætla po:so
AM st:öfunda po:so
AM st:örvænta po:so
AM st:vegna po:so
AM st:dreyma po:so
AM st:langa po:so
AM st:sundla po:so
AM st:vanta po:so
AM st:ára po:so
AM st:dimma po:so
AM st:rigna po:so
AM st:ske po:so
AM st:snjóa po:so
AM st:stirna po:so
AM st:vora po:so
AM po:ao
AM po:fs
AM po:st
#son/dóttir
SFX 526 N 11
SFX 526 0 son
SFX 526 0 syni
SFX 526 0 sonar
SFX 526 0 synir
SFX 526 0 sonum
SFX 526 0 sona
SFX 526 0 dóttir
SFX 526 0 dóttur
SFX 526 0 dætur
SFX 526 0 dætrum
SFX 526 0 dætra

# Fallbeyging hk sb 01
SFX 1 N 69
SFX 1 0 ið .	1
SFX 1 m m .	2
SFX 1 l l .	2
SFX 1 t t .	2
SFX 1 ð ð .	2
SFX 1 r r .	2
SFX 1 s s .	2
SFX 1 g g .	2
SFX 1 n n .	2
SFX 1 k k .	2
SFX 1 f f .	2
SFX 1 d d .	2
SFX 1 p p .	2
SFX 1 í í .	2
SFX 1 ó ó .	2
SFX 1 á á .	2
SFX 1 ú ú .	2
SFX 1 æ æ .	2
SFX 1 é é .	2
SFX 1 y y .	2
SFX 1 0 in .	3
SFX 1 m m .	4
SFX 1 l l .	4
SFX 1 t t .	4
SFX 1 ð ð .	4
SFX 1 r r .	4
SFX 1 s s .	4
SFX 1 g g .	4
SFX 1 n n .	4
SFX 1 k k .	4
SFX 1 f f .	4
SFX 1 d d .	4
SFX 1 p p .	4
SFX 1 í í .	4
SFX 1 ó ó .	4
SFX 1 á á .	4
SFX 1 ú ú .	4
SFX 1 æ æ .	4
SFX 1 é é .	4
SFX 1 y y .	4
SFX 1 0 ið .	5
SFX 1 m m .	6
SFX 1 l l .	6
SFX 1 t t .	6
SFX 1 ð ð .	6
SFX 1 r r .	6
SFX 1 s s .	6
SFX 1 g g .	6
SFX 1 n n .	6
SFX 1 k k .	6
SFX 1 f f .	6
SFX 1 d d .	6
SFX 1 p p .	6
SFX 1 í í .	6
SFX 1 ó ó .	6
SFX 1 á á .	6
SFX 1 ú ú .	6
SFX 1 æ æ .	6
SFX 1 é é .	6
SFX 1 y y .	6
SFX 1 0 in .	7
SFX 1 0 i .	8
SFX 1 0 inu .	9
SFX 1 0 um .	10
SFX 1 0 unum .	11
SFX 1 0 s .	12
SFX 1 0 sins .	13
SFX 1 0 a .	14
SFX 1 0 anna .	15

# Fallbeyging hk sb 01 -s
SFX 2 N 19
SFX 2 0 ið .	1
SFX 2 s s .	2
SFX 2 x x .	2
SFX 2 0 in .	3
SFX 2 s s .	4
SFX 2 x x .	4
SFX 2 0 ið .	5
SFX 2 s s .	6
SFX 2 x x .	6
SFX 2 0 in .	7
SFX 2 0 i .	8
SFX 2 0 inu .	9
SFX 2 0 um .	10
SFX 2 0 unum .	11
SFX 2 s s .	12
SFX 2 x x .	12
SFX 2 0 ins .	13
SFX 2 0 a .	14
SFX 2 0 anna .	15

# Fallbeyging hk sb 01 -s et
SFX 3 N 7
SFX 3 0 ið .	1
SFX 3 s s .	4
SFX 3 0 ið .	5
SFX 3 0 i .	8
SFX 3 0 inu .	9
SFX 3 s s .	12
SFX 3 0 ins .	13

# Fallbeyging hk sb 01 -s ö
SFX 4 N 23
SFX 4 0 ið .	1
SFX 4 ax öx .	2
SFX 4 als öls .	2
SFX 4 ax öxin .	3
SFX 4 als ölsin .	3
SFX 4 x x .	4
SFX 4 s s .	4
SFX 4 0 ið .	5
SFX 4 ax öx .	6
SFX 4 als öls .	6
SFX 4 ax öxin .	7
SFX 4 als ölsin .	7
SFX 4 0 i .	8
SFX 4 0 inu .	9
SFX 4 ax öxum .	10
SFX 4 als ölsum .	10
SFX 4 ax öxunum .	11
SFX 4 als ölsunum .	11
SFX 4 x x .	12
SFX 4 s s .	12
SFX 4 0 ins .	13
SFX 4 0 a .	14
SFX 4 0 anna .	15

# Fallbeyging hk sb 01 a
SFX 5 N 15
SFX 5 0 ið .	1
SFX 5 r r .	2
SFX 5 0 in .	3
SFX 5 r r .	4
SFX 5 0 ið .	5
SFX 5 r r .	6
SFX 5 0 in .	7
SFX 5 0 i .	8
SFX 5 0 inu .	9
SFX 5 0 um .	10
SFX 5 0 unum .	11
SFX 5 0 s .	12
SFX 5 0 sins .	13
SFX 5 ör ara .	14
SFX 5 ör aranna .	15

# Fallbeyging hk sb 01 et
SFX 6 N 26
SFX 6 0 ið .	1
SFX 6 n n .	4
SFX 6 ð ð .	4
SFX 6 r r .	4
SFX 6 l l .	4
SFX 6 m m .	4
SFX 6 t t .	4
SFX 6 k k .	4
SFX 6 ý ý .	4
SFX 6 d d .	4
SFX 6 f f .	4
SFX 6 x x .	4
SFX 6 e e .	4
SFX 6 á á .	4
SFX 6 p p .	4
SFX 6 g g .	4
SFX 6 í í .	4
SFX 6 s s .	4
SFX 6 ó ó .	4
SFX 6 ú ú .	4
SFX 6 y y .	4
SFX 6 0 ið .	5
SFX 6 0 i .	8
SFX 6 0 inu .	9
SFX 6 0 s .	12
SFX 6 0 sins .	13

# Fallbeyging hk sb 01 ft
SFX 7 N 13
SFX 7 0 in .	3
SFX 7 s s .	6
SFX 7 l l .	6
SFX 7 ð ð .	6
SFX 7 k k .	6
SFX 7 n n .	6
SFX 7 f f .	6
SFX 7 t t .	6
SFX 7 0 in .	7
SFX 7 0 um .	10
SFX 7 0 unum .	11
SFX 7 0 a .	14
SFX 7 0 anna .	15

# Fallbeyging hk sb 01 j
SFX 8 N 39
SFX 8 0 ið .	1
SFX 8 ý ý .	2
SFX 8 f f .	2
SFX 8 g g .	2
SFX 8 n n .	2
SFX 8 r r .	2
SFX 8 s s .	2
SFX 8 l l .	2
SFX 8 y y .	2
SFX 8 æ æ .	2
SFX 8 0 in .	3
SFX 8 ý ý .	4
SFX 8 f f .	4
SFX 8 g g .	4
SFX 8 n n .	4
SFX 8 r r .	4
SFX 8 s s .	4
SFX 8 l l .	4
SFX 8 y y .	4
SFX 8 æ æ .	4
SFX 8 0 ið .	5
SFX 8 ý ý .	6
SFX 8 f f .	6
SFX 8 g g .	6
SFX 8 n n .	6
SFX 8 r r .	6
SFX 8 s s .	6
SFX 8 l l .	6
SFX 8 y y .	6
SFX 8 æ æ .	6
SFX 8 0 in .	7
SFX 8 0 i .	8
SFX 8 0 inu .	9
SFX 8 0 jum .	10
SFX 8 0 junum .	11
SFX 8 0 s .	12
SFX 8 0 sins .	13
SFX 8 0 ja .	14
SFX 8 0 janna .	15

# Fallbeyging hk sb 01 og 01 j
SFX 9 N 19
SFX 9 0 ið .	1
SFX 9 r r .	2
SFX 9 0 in .	3
SFX 9 r r .	4
SFX 9 0 ið .	5
SFX 9 r r .	6
SFX 9 0 in .	7
SFX 9 0 i .	8
SFX 9 0 inu .	9
SFX 9 0 um .	10
SFX 9 0 jum .	10
SFX 9 0 unum .	11
SFX 9 0 junum .	11
SFX 9 0 s .	12
SFX 9 0 sins .	13
SFX 9 0 a .	14
SFX 9 0 ja .	14
SFX 9 0 anna .	15
SFX 9 0 janna .	15

# Fallbeyging hk sb 01 og 01a
SFX 10 N 16
SFX 10 0 ið .	1
SFX 10 ó ó .	2
SFX 10 0 in .	3
SFX 10 ó ó .	4
SFX 10 0 ið .	5
SFX 10 ó ó .	6
SFX 10 0 in .	7
SFX 10 ó ó .	8
SFX 10 0 i .	8
SFX 10 0 inu .	9
SFX 10 0 um .	10
SFX 10 0 unum .	11
SFX 10 0 s .	12
SFX 10 0 sins .	13
SFX 10 0 a .	14
SFX 10 0 anna .	15

# Fallbeyging hk sb 01 og 01a et
SFX 11 N 12
SFX 11 0 ið .	1
SFX 11 r r .	4
SFX 11 n n .	4
SFX 11 ó ó .	4
SFX 11 0 ið .	5
SFX 11 r r .	8
SFX 11 0 i .	8
SFX 11 n n .	8
SFX 11 ó ó .	8
SFX 11 0 inu .	9
SFX 11 0 s .	12
SFX 11 0 sins .	13

# Fallbeyging hk sb 01 u
SFX 12 N 15
SFX 12 0 ið .	1
SFX 12 að uð .	2
SFX 12 að uðin .	3
SFX 12 ð ð .	4
SFX 12 0 ið .	5
SFX 12 að uð .	6
SFX 12 að uðin .	7
SFX 12 0 i .	8
SFX 12 0 inu .	9
SFX 12 að uðum .	10
SFX 12 að uðunum .	11
SFX 12 0 s .	12
SFX 12 0 sins .	13
SFX 12 0 a .	14
SFX 12 0 anna .	15

# Fallbeyging hk sb 01 uð
SFX 13 N 15
SFX 13 0 ið .	1
SFX 13 ð ð .	2
SFX 13 0 in .	3
SFX 13 ð ð .	4
SFX 13 0 ið .	5
SFX 13 ð ð .	6
SFX 13 0 in .	7
SFX 13 uð ði .	8
SFX 13 uð ðinu .	9
SFX 13 uð ðum .	10
SFX 13 uð ðunum .	11
SFX 13 0 s .	12
SFX 13 0 sins .	13
SFX 13 uð ða .	14
SFX 13 uð ðanna .	15
